Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20219-1113
Gaming device; acts prohibited; penalties.

(1) A person who manufactures, sells, or distributes a device that is intended by such person to be used to violate any provision of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(2) A person who marks, alters, or otherwise modifies any gaming device in a manner that (a) affects the result of a wager by determining win or loss or (b) alters the normal criteria of random selection that (i) affects the operation of a game of chance or (ii) determines the outcome of a game of chance is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(3) A person who knowingly possesses any gaming device that has been manufactured, sold, or distributed in violation of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 2021, LB561, § 37.